Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2601.02
Legislative intent.

The Legislature recognizes the need for providing mechanisms for intervening in the lives of certain persons who are impaired by reason of disability. It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the use of guardianships and conservatorships for such intervention. It is also the intent of the Legislature to encourage the least restrictive alternative possible on the impaired person's exercise of personal and civil rights consistent with the impaired person's need for services by encouraging judges to utilize limited guardianships if appropriate.

Laws 1997, LB 466, § 4.